test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ricca_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - riččá: # á-stems
    riččá+N+Sg+Nom: riččá
    riččá+N+Sg+Gen: ričá
    riččá+N+Sg+Acc: ričá
    riččá+N+Sg+Ill: riičán
    riččá+N+Sg+Loc: riččáást
    riččá+N+Sg+Com: riččáin
    riččá+N+Sg+Abe: ričáttáá
    riččá+N+Ess: riččán
    riččá+N+Par: riččád
    riččá+N+Pl+Nom: ričáh
    riččá+N+Pl+Gen: ričái
    riččá+N+Pl+Acc: riččáid
    riččá+N+Pl+Ill: riččáid
    riččá+N+Pl+Loc: riččáin
    riččá+N+Pl+Com: ričáiguin
    riččá+N+Pl+Abe: ričáittáá
 
